New York, session 2025-2026, A9347.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 22-a of the military law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, no 4 organized militia from another state, territory, or district may enter 5 into this state for the purpose of doing military duty without the 6 express permission of the governor, unless such militia has been called 7 into federal service and is acting under authority of the president of 8 the United States. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13858-03-6